Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [504B.372] LOCAL EVICTION MORATORIUM PERMITTED. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding sections 504B.281 to 504B.371, in the event of a public safety threat or natural disaster, or for humanitarian purposes, a municipality, as defined in section 469.1812, subdivision 3, may, by ordinance or rule, prohibit the filing of an eviction action based on nonpayment of rent for a period up to 90 days. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end